North Carolina statutes. Chapter 120. General Assembly.
Article 2. Duty and Privilege of Members.

§ 120-5.
Presiding officers may administer oaths.

The President of the Senate is authorized to administer oaths for the qualification of Senators and officers of the Senate, and the Speaker of the House of Representatives is authorized to administer oaths for the qualification of all officers of the House and all members who shall appear after the election of Speaker.

History.

1883, c. 19; Code, s. 2855; Rev., s. 4400; C.S., s. 6089.

§ 120-6.
Members to convene at appointed time and place.

Every person elected to represent any county or district in the General Assembly shall appear at such time and place as may be appointed for the meeting thereof, on the first day, and attend to the public business as occasion shall require.

History.

1787, c. 277, s. 1, P.R; R.C., c. 52, s. 27; Code, s. 2847; Rev., s. 4401; C.S., s. 6090.

§ 120-6.1.
Request that reconvened session not be held.

As provided by Section 22(7) of Article II of the Constitution of North Carolina, if within 30 days after adjournment, a bill is returned by the Governor with objections and veto message to that house in which it shall have originated, the Governor shall reconvene that session as provided by Section 5(11) of Article III of the Constitution for reconsideration of the bill, unless the Governor prior to reconvening the session receives written requests dated no earlier than 30 days after such adjournment, signed by a majority of the members of each house that a reconvened session to reconsider vetoed legislation is unnecessary. If sufficient requests are received such that the session will not be reconvened, the Governor shall immediately issue a proclamation to that effect and so notify the President Pro Tempore of the Senate and the principal clerks and presiding officers of both houses.

The form for the requests shall be:“To the Governor:A reconvened session to reconsider vetoed legislation is unnecessary.

Click to view

This day of , ,, Member of the [Senate] [House of Representatives]” Petitions as they are received are public records and shall be maintained by the Office of the Governor.

History.

1995, c. 20, s. 15.1; 1997-1, s. 2.

§ 120-7.
Penalty for failure to discharge duty.

If any member shall fail to appear, or shall neglect to attend to the duties of his office, he shall forfeit and pay for not appearing ten dollars ($10.00), and two dollars ($2.00) for every day he may be absent from his duties during the session, to be deducted from his pay as a member; but a majority of the members of either house of the General Assembly may remit such fines and forfeitures, or any part thereof, where it shall appear that such member has been prevented from attending to his duties by sickness or other sufficient cause.

History.

1787, c. 277, s. 2, P.R; R.C., c. 52, s. 28; Code, s. 2848; Rev., s. 4402; C.S., s. 6091.

§ 120-8.
Expulsion for corrupt practices in election.

If any person elected a member of the General Assembly shall by himself or any other person, directly or indirectly, give, or cause to be given, any money, property, reward or present whatsoever, or give, or cause to be given by himself or another, any treat or entertainment of meat or drink, at any public meeting or collection of the people, to any person for his vote or to influence him in his election, such person shall, on due proof, be expelled from his seat in the General Assembly.

History.

1801, c. 580, s. 2, P.R; R.C., c. 52, s. 24; Code, s. 2846; Rev., s. 4403; C.S., s. 6092.

§ 120-9.
Freedom of speech.

The members shall have freedom of speech and debate in the General Assembly, and shall not be liable to impeachment or question, in any court or place out of the General Assembly, for words therein spoken.

History.

1787, c. 277, s. 3, P.R; R.C., c. 52, s. 29; Code, s. 2849; Rev., s. 4404; C.S., 6093; 1991 (Reg. Sess., 1992), c. 1037, s. 1; 2000-140, s. 28.

Legal Periodicals.

For article analyzing the evolution of First Amendment speech rights in North Carolina, see 4 Campbell L. Rev. 243 (1982).